District of Columbia statutes.
47-4655

The Washington Ballet, Lot 19, Square 1911.

(a)

The real property described as Lot 19, Square 1911, together with any improvements on the real property and any future improvements constructed on the real property, shall be exempt from all taxation, including ordinary and special taxes and use or possessory interest taxes, interest, penalties, fees, and other related charges, beginning November 1, 2008, and continuing for as long as the real property is owned by The Washington Ballet and used for the purposes and activities of The Washington Ballet, including the instruction, presentation, and celebration of dance, exercise, and related activities, and the provision of room and board for its students and instructors, and not used for commercial purposes, subject to the provisions of §§ 47-1005, 47-1007, and 47-1009.

(b)

The one-time transfer of the real property described in subsection (a) of this section to The Washington Ballet shall not be subject to the recordation taxes and fees under Chapter 11 of Title 42 [§ 42-1101 et seq.].

(c)

The amount necessary to redeem the real property described in subsection (a) of this section under § 47-1361 shall be deposited with the Chief Financial Officer on behalf of the owner, and the Chief Financial Officer shall cancel the December 2, 2009 tax sale of the real property described in subsection (a) of this section.

Jan. 12, 2012, D.C. Law 19-77, § 2(b), 58 DCR 10100
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section 3 of D.C. Law 19-77, see § 7006 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section 3 of D.C. Law 19-77, see § 7006 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).
Section 3 of D.C. Law 19-77 provided: “Sec. 3. Applicability. This act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.”